Washington statutes.
RCW 28A.420.050

Discipline—Adverse actions.

(1) Nothing in this compact shall be deemed or construed to limit the authority of a member state to investigate or impose disciplinary measures on teachers according to the state practice laws thereof.

(2) Member states shall be authorized to receive, and shall provide, files and information regarding the investigation and discipline, if any, of teachers in other member states upon request. Any member state receiving such information or files shall protect and maintain the security and confidentiality thereof, in at least the same manner that it maintains its own investigatory or disciplinary files and information. Prior to disclosing any disciplinary or investigatory information received from another member state, the disclosing state shall communicate its intention and purpose for such disclosure to the member state which originally provided that information.

[ 2024 c 317 s 6.]